Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,137
Dissolved corporation; trustees; bond.

Such trustees shall enter into bond, in such a penalty and with such security as the court may approve, conditioned for the faithful discharge of their trust.

R.S.1867, Code § 720, p. 519;

R.S.1913, § 8344;

C.S.1922, § 9296;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,128;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,137.